es: Cantidad de aletas: 2 alas; 3 alas; 4 alas; 5 o más alas; Otro
vi: Số lượng cánh: 2 cánh; 3 cánh; 4 cánh; Hơn 5 cánh; Khác
cs: Počet křídel: 2 křídla; 3křídlé; 4křídlé; 5+ křídel; Jiné
fi: Siipien lukumäärä: 2-siipinen; 3-siipinen; 4-siipinen; Yli 5-siipinen; Muu
lt-LT: Sparnų skaičius: 2 sparnų; 3 sparnų; 4 sparnų; 5 ar daugiau sparnų; Kita
de: Flügelanzahl: 2 Flügel; 3 Flügel; 4 Flügel; 5+ Flügel; Sonstige
tr: Kanat sayısı: 2 kanatlı; 3 kanatlı; 4 kanatlı; 5+ kanatlı; Diğer
nl: Aantal vleugels: 2 vleugels; 3 vleugels; 4 vleugels; 5+ vleugels; Overige
ro-RO: Număr de aripi: 2 aripi; 3 aripi; 4 aripi; 5+ aripi; Altele
it: Numero di ali: 2 ali; 3 ali; 4 ali; 5+ ali; Altro
zh-CN: 翼片数量: 双翼; 三翼; 四翼; 5 翼及以上; 其他
pl: Liczba skrzydeł: 2 skrzydła; 3 skrzydła; 4 skrzydła; 5+ skrzydeł; Inna
pt-BR: Contagem de abas: 2 asas; 3 asas; 4 asas; 5+ asas; Outro
nb: Antall vinger: 2-vinget; 3-vinget; 4-vinget; 5+ vinger; Annet
th: จำนวนปีก: 2 ปีก; 3 ปีก; 4 ปีก; 5 ปีกขึ้นไป; อื่นๆ
fr: Nombre d'ailes: 2 ailes; 3 ailes; 4 ailes; 5 ailes et +; Autre
bg-BG: Брой крила: С 2 крила; С 3 крила; С 4 крила; С 5+ крила; Друго
ru: Количество крыльев: 2 крыла; 3 крыла; 4 крыла; 5 и более крыльев; Другое
sl-SI: Število kril: 2 krili; 3 krila; 4 krila; 5 ali več kril; Drugo
zh-TW: 風翼數量: 2 翼; 3 翼; 4 翼; 5 翼以上; 其他
hr-HR: Broj krila: 2 krila; 3 krila; 4 krila; 5+ krila; Ostalo
ja: ウィング数: 2翼; 3翼; 4翼; 5翼以上; その他
pt-PT: Número de asas: 2 asas; 3 asas; 4 asas; 5+ asas; Outro
ko: 날개 수: 2날개; 3날개; 4날개; 5개 이상 날개; 기타
sv: Antal vingar: 2-vingad; 3-vingad; 4-vingad; 5+ vingar; Övrigt
el: Αριθμός πτερύγων: 2 πτερυγίων; 3 πτερυγίων; 4 πτερυγίων; 5+ πτερύγια; Άλλο
hu: Szárnyak száma: 2 szárnyú; 3 szárnyú; 4 szárnyú; 5 vagy több szárnyú; Egyéb
en: Wing count: 2-wing; 3-wing; 4-wing; 5+ wings; Other
da: Vingeantal: 2 vinger; 3 vinger; 4 vinger; 5+ vinger; Andet
sk-SK: Počet krídel: 2 krídla; 3 krídla; 4 krídla; 5 a viac krídel; Iné